Wyoming, session 2025, HB0156.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 18-16-102(a)(ix)(E), (F) and by
creating a new subparagraph (G), 22-1-102(a)(xxvi), (xxvii)
and by creating new paragraphs (lv) and (lvi),
22-3-102(a)(i) and by creating a new paragraph (vi),
22-3-103(a) by creating new paragraphs (ix) and (x) and
(b), 22-3-117(a)(intro), 22-3-118(a)(ii) and
22-29-104(a)(v)(E), (F) and by creating a new subparagraph
(G) are amended to read:
18-16-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(ix) "Qualified elector" means a natural person
who:
(E) Has not been convicted of a felony or
if convicted has had his civil rights or voting rights
restored; and
(F) Is registered to vote; and
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0156
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(G) Has been a bona fide resident of
Wyoming for not less than thirty (30) days before the date
of the election at which he offers to vote.
22-1-102. Definitions.
(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:
(xxvi) "Qualified elector" includes every
citizen of the United States who is a bona fide resident of
Wyoming, has been a bona fide resident of Wyoming for not
less than thirty (30) days before the date of the election
at which he offers to vote, has registered to vote and will
be at least eighteen (18) years of age on the day of the
election at which he may offer to vote. No person is a
qualified elector who is a currently adjudicated mentally
incompetent person, or who has been convicted of a felony
and his civil or voting rights have not been restored. A
literacy test shall not be imposed as a condition to voting
in any election;
(xxvii) "Registration" is the entry and
verification of the name, residence, citizenship and voter
information of a qualified elector on the official registry
list, as provided in W.S. 22-3-104(f) and 22-3-108;
(lv) "Proof of residence" means the documents
or other proof of residence specified by rule of the
secretary of state, which rule identifies documents or
other proof that establishes residency. If a person does
not have the documents or other proof of residency
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0156
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
specified by rule of the secretary of state, "proof of
residence" may be established by a signed attestation of
the person that the person is a bona fide resident of the
state of Wyoming. The attestation shall be subject to
verification by the county clerk or the secretary of state;
(lvi) "Proof of United States citizenship"
means, for purposes of voter registration, any of the
following:
(A) A valid Wyoming driver's license as
defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxv) or a valid Wyoming
identification card issued under W.S. 31-8-101, provided
that the license or identification card does not contain
any indication that the person is not a United States
citizen;
(B) A valid tribal identification card
issued by the governing body of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe
or the Northern Arapaho Tribe of the Wind River Indian
Reservation or any other federally recognized Indian tribe,
provided that the identification card does not contain any
indication that the person is not a United States citizen;
(C) A valid driver's license or
identification card issued by any other state that is
consistent with the Real ID Act as defined by W.S.
31-7-102(a)(lii), provided that the driver's license or
identification card does not include any indication that
the person is not a United States citizen;
(D) A valid United States passport;
(E) A certificate of United States
citizenship;
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0156
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(F) A certificate of naturalization;
(G) A United States military draft record
or a selective service registration acknowledgment card;
(H) A consular report of birth abroad
issued by the United States department of state;
(J) An original or certified copy of a
birth certificate in the United States bearing an official
seal.
22-3-102. Qualifications; temporary registration.
(a) A person may register to vote not less than
fourteen (14) days before an election, at any election
specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii) or as
provided by W.S. 22-3-117, who satisfies the following
qualifications:
(i) He is a citizen of the United States, as
evidenced by providing proof of United States citizenship
as defined by W.S. 22-1-102(a)(lvi);
(vi) He has been a bona fide resident of Wyoming
for not less than thirty (30) days before the date of the
election at which he offers to vote.
22-3-103. Furnishing of oath forms; contents thereof.
(a) The county clerk shall furnish voter registration
oath forms to registry agents which forms shall require the
following voter information from the applicant:
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0156
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ix) Proof of residence as defined in W.S.
22-1-102(a)(lv);
(x) Proof of United States citizenship as
defined by W.S. 22-1-102(a)(lvi).
(b) Following the provision of the information
required in subsection (a) of this section, the form shall
require the applicant's signature in full below the
following oath:
I, ...., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen
of the United States; that I am a bona fide resident of the
state of Wyoming and this county; I have resided in the
state for not less than thirty (30) days before the date of
the election; that if registered in another county or
state, I hereby request that my registration be withdrawn;
that I will be at least eighteen (18) years of age on or
before the next election; that I am not currently
adjudicated a mentally incompetent person, that I have not
been convicted of a felony, or if I have been convicted of
a felony, I have had my civil or voting rights restored by
a competent authority; and that the voter registration
information contained herein is true and accurate to my
best knowledge and belief.
.... (Signature in full of applicant)
Subscribed and affirmed or sworn to before me by .... this
.... day of ...., (year).
.... (Signature and title of registry agent
or person authorized to administer oaths)
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0156
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
22-3-117. Absentee registration generally; use of
federal postcard.
(a) Notwithstanding any other section or provision in
this chapter, any citizen of the United States who is a
resident of Wyoming may apply for registration by providing
the information required by W.S. 22-3-103(a), and
acceptable identification, to proof of United States
citizenship and proof of residence and by completing and
subscribing, the form of voter registration oath prescribed
by W.S. 22-3-103(b) before any person authorized by law to
administer oaths. Each county clerk shall furnish the voter
registration oath forms. The applicant shall mail or
return the completed voter registration oath form to the
county clerk in the county in which the applicant resides.
In order to vote in the next election, the application must
be received in the county clerk's office before the close
of registration for that election, or:
22-3-118. Proof of identity.
(a) Unless a voter is challenged pursuant to W.S.
22-15-101 through 22-15-109, and except as provided in W.S.
22-9-104(a)(vi) for an absentee ballot obtained in person
by the elector, no identification shall be required when:
(ii) Voting by absentee ballot after having
registered by mail and having submitted a copy of the
person's acceptable identification, proof of United States
citizenship as defined by W.S. 22-1-102(a)(lvi) and proof
of residence as set forth in W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxxix)(A) and
(lv), at the time of registration.
22-29-104. Definitions when principal act is silent.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0156
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) When used in a principal act, the following
definitions apply, unless the term is otherwise
specifically defined in that principal act:
(v) "Qualified elector" means a natural person
who:
(E) Has not been convicted of a felony, or,
if so convicted, has had his civil or voting rights
restored; and
(F) Has registered to vote; and
(G) Has been a bona fide resident of
Wyoming for not less than thirty (30) days before the date
of the election at which he offers to vote.
Section 2. The secretary of state shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0156
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
8